Utah statutes.
11-36a-503.   Notice of preparation of an impact fee analysis.

(1)  Before preparing or contracting to prepare an impact fee analysis, each local political subdivision or, subject to Subsection (2), private entity shall post a public notice on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section 63F-1-701.

(2)  For a private entity required to post notice on the Utah Public Notice Website under Subsection (1):

(a)  the private entity shall give notice to the general purpose local government in which the private entity's primary business is located; and

(b)  the general purpose local government described in Subsection (2)(a) shall post the notice on the Utah Public Notice Website.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

